Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.080

Disclosures to consumer—Procedures.

(1) A consumer reporting agency shall make the disclosures required under RCW 19.182.070 during normal business hours and on reasonable notice.

(2) The consumer reporting agency shall make the disclosures required under RCW 19.182.070 to the consumer:

(a) In person if the consumer appears in person and furnishes proper identification;

(b) By telephone if the consumer has made a written request, with proper identification, for telephone disclosure and the toll charge, if any, for the telephone call is prepaid by or charged directly to the consumer; or

(c) By any other reasonable means that are available to the consumer reporting agency if that means is authorized by the consumer.

(3) A consumer reporting agency shall provide trained personnel to explain to the consumer, information furnished to the consumer under RCW 19.182.070.

(4) The consumer reporting agency shall permit the consumer to be accompanied by one other person of the consumer's choosing, who shall furnish reasonable identification. A consumer reporting agency may require the consumer to furnish a written statement granting permission to the consumer reporting agency to discuss the consumer's file in the other person's presence.

(5) If a credit score is provided by a consumer reporting agency to a consumer, the agency shall provide an explanation of the meaning of the credit score.

(6) Except as provided in RCW 19.182.150, no consumer may bring an action or proceeding in the nature of defamation, invasion of privacy, or negligence with respect to the reporting of information against a consumer reporting agency or a user of information, based on information disclosed under this section or RCW 19.182.070, except as to false information furnished with malice or willful intent to injure the consumer. Except as provided in RCW 19.182.150, no consumer may bring an action or proceeding against a person who provides information to a consumer reporting agency in the nature of defamation, invasion of privacy, or negligence for unintentional error.

(7)(a) A consumer reporting agency must provide to a consumer, with each written disclosure by the agency to the consumer under RCW 19.182.070, a written summary of all rights and remedies the consumer has under this chapter.

(b) The summary of the rights and remedies of consumers under this chapter must include:

(i) A brief description of this chapter and all rights and remedies of consumers under this chapter;

(ii) An explanation of how the consumer may exercise the rights and remedies of the consumer under this chapter; and

(iii) A list of all state agencies, including the attorney general's office, responsible for enforcing any provision of this chapter and the address and appropriate phone number of each such agency.

[ 1993 c 476 s 10.]